District of Columbia statutes.
6-321.03

Transfer of jurisdiction to Agency.

The Council of the District of Columbia shall, at the time of transferring to the Agency right, title, and interest in and to any of the property described in § 6-321.01, also transfer to the Agency the Mayor’s jurisdiction as provided by § 10-501.01 over so much of the said property as may be so transferred.

Sept. 8, 1960, 74 Stat. 871, Pub. L. 86-736, § 3
July 9, 2012, 126 Stat. 990, Pub. L. 112-143, § 1(e)(2)
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402 (129) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
Pub. L. 112-143 substituted “The” for “Subject to the provisions of § 6-321.05, the”.
1973 Ed., § 5-722.
1981 Ed., § 5-824.